Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-4021
Recovery of tax, interest, or penalty; effect.

The Tax Commissioner may recover the amount of any tax, interest, or penalty imposed under the Tobacco Products Tax Act in a civil action. The Uniform State Tax Lien Registration and Enforcement Act shall apply to such taxes, interest, or penalties. The collection of such tax, interest, or penalty shall not be a bar to any criminal prosecution pursuant to section 77-4024.

Laws 1987, LB 730, § 21.

Uniform State Tax Lien Registration and Enforcement Act, see section 77-3901.